District of Columbia statutes.
47-203

Expenditures for buildings and grounds — Preparation of estimates.

Estimates of expenditures for buildings and grounds for the public schools of the District of Columbia, shall hereafter be prepared in accordance with the provisions of the Act of Congress approved February 26, 1925.

History

Feb. 26, 1925, 43 Stat. 994, ch. 342, § 9
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-203.
1973 Ed., § 47-203.